Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202671-6103
Terms, defined.

For purposes of the Interior Design Voluntary Registration Act:

(1) Design means the preparation of schematics, layouts, plans, drawings, specifications, calculations, and other diagnostic documents which show the features of a registered interior design project;

(2) Direct supervision means having full professional knowledge over work that constitutes the practice of registered interior design;

(3) Good ethical character means such character that will enable a person to discharge the fiduciary duties of a registered interior designer to such person's client and to the public for the protection of the public health, safety, and welfare;

(4) Interior alteration or construction project means a project for an interior space or area within a proposed or existing building or structure, including construction, modification, renovation, rehabilitation, or historic preservation that involves changing or altering:

(a) The design function or layout of rooms; or

(b) The state of permanent fixtures or equipment;

(5) Interior nonstructural element means an element or component of a building that does not require structural bracing, is not load-bearing, and is not essential to the structural or seismic integrity of the building;

(6)(a) Practice of registered interior design means the design of interior spaces as part of an interior alteration or construction project in conformity with public health, safety, and welfare requirements, including the preparation of any document relating to a building code description, any project egress plan that does not require additional exits in the space affected, any space planning, any finish material, any furnishing, any fixture, any equipment, and the preparation of any document and technical submission relating to interior construction; and

(b) Services that are not in the scope of the practice of registered interior design include:

(i) Services that constitute:

(A) The practice of professional engineering; or

(B) The practice of professional architecture, except as specifically provided for within the Engineers and Architects Regulation Act;

(ii) The construction or alteration of:

(A) The structural system of a building, including changing the building's live or dead load on the structural system;

(B) The building envelope, including an exterior wall, wall covering, or wall opening, an exterior window, an exterior door, any architectural trim, a balcony or similar projection, a bay, an oriel window, any roof assembly and rooftop structure, and any glass and glazing for exterior use in both vertical and sloped applications;

(C) Any mechanical, plumbing, heating, air conditioning, ventilation, electrical, vertical transportation, fire sprinkler, or fire alarm system;

(D) An egress system beyond the exit access component of such system; and

(E) Any life safety system such as a fire safety or fire protection of structural elements and smoke evacuation and compartmentalization system or a fire-rated vertical shaft in multistory structures;

(iii) Changes to an occupancy classification of greater hazard as determined by the International Building Code; and

(iv) Changes to the construction classification of the building or structure according to the International Building Code;

(7) Project means one or more related activities that require the practice of registered interior design for completion; and

(8) Registered interior designer or registrant means a person who is listed on the registry of interior designers under the Interior Design Voluntary Registration Act.

Laws 2024, LB16, § 16.

Engineers and Architects Regulation Act, see section 81-3401.